Hawaii statutes.
§338-25 Prerequisite for permit. No
permit under section 338-23 shall be issued until a certificate of death or
fetal death, as far as it can be completed under the circumstances of the case,
has been filed and until all the regulations of the department of health in
respect to the issuance of such permit have been complied with. [L 1949, c 327,
§29; am L 1951, c 92, §5; RL 1955, §57-28; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS
§338-25]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next